Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1039.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-353, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-353. Recovery of costs; attorney discipline investigations; definition A. In an attorney discipline matter, if an attorney who is the subject of the charge prevails, the following apply: 1. In addition to any costs that are awarded by statute, the state bar of Arizona is responsible to the attorney for any attorney fees, loss of earnings and court costs.  Court costs include the cost of all stages of the investigation and discipline process and, if applicable, any court litigation and appeal. Loss of earnings are calculated during the time period that covers all stages of the investigation and discipline process and, if applicable, any court litigation and appeal. 2. The attorney may file a claim against the state bar of Arizona if the attorney suffers damage to the attorney's reputation. B. For the purposes of this section, "attorney discipline matter" means any charge that is not dismissed by the state bar of Arizona before final disposition of the complaint by the presiding disciplinary judge or the supreme court. END_STATUTE